Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 5 Boxing and Wrestling
41-5-23.
Annual report to general assembly.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall make an annual report to the general assembly on or before the first Wednesday in February, together with any recommendations for legislation, that it may deem desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-23

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 9.

41-5-24.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to compensate members and employees; the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the sum so appropriated, or so much thereof as may be necessary upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, §§ 2, 19; P.L. 1927, ch. 963, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-24

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.